Missouri, session 2026, SB1783.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 217.695, 217.720, and 217.722, RSMo,
are repealed and four new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to
be known as sections 217.695, 217.720, 217.722, and 217.723, to
read as follows:
217.695. 1. As used in this section, the following
terms mean:
(1) "Chief law enforcement official", the county
sheriff, chief of police or other public official
responsible for enforcement of criminal laws within a county
or city not within a county;
(2) "County" includes a city not within a county;
(3) "Offender", a person in the custody of the
department or under the supervision of the division of
probation and parole.
2. (1) Each offender to be released from custody of
the department who will be under the supervision of the
division of probation and parole, except an offender
transferred to another state pursuant to the interstate
corrections compact, shall shortly before release be
required to: complete a registration form indicating his or

SB 1783 2
her intended address upon release, employer, parent's
address, and such other information as may be required;
submit to photographs; submit to fingerprints; or undergo
other identification procedures including but not limited to
hair samples or other identification indicia. All data and
indicia of identification shall be compiled in duplicate,
with one set to be retained by the department, and one set
for the chief law enforcement official of the county of
intended residence.
(2) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the
contrary, the division of probation and parole shall forward
the terms and conditions of an offender's probation or
parole to the Missouri state highway patrol within five
business days of an offender's release from custody of the
department of corrections and entry into supervision by the
division. Such terms and conditions of probation or parole
shall be recorded in the Missouri uniform law enforcement
system (MULES), where such information is available to
members of the criminal justice system, and other entities
as provided by law, upon inquiry.
3. Any offender subject to the provisions of this
section who changes his or her county of residence shall, in
addition to notifying the division of probation and parole,
notify and register with the chief law enforcement official
of the county of residence within seven days after he or she
changes his or her residence to that county.
4. Failure by an offender to register with the chief
law enforcement official upon a change in the county of his
or her residence shall be cause for revocation of the parole
of the person except for good cause shown.
5. The department, the division of probation and
parole, and the chief law enforcement official shall cause

SB 1783 3
the information collected on the initial registration and
any subsequent changes in residence or registration to be
recorded with the highway patrol criminal information system.
6. The director of the department of public safety
shall design and distribute the registration forms required
by this section and shall provide any administrative
assistance needed to facilitate the provisions of this
section.
217.720. 1. At any time during release on parole or
conditional release the division of probation and parole may
issue a warrant for the arrest of a released offender for
violation of any of the conditions of parole or conditional
release. The warrant shall authorize any law enforcement
officer to return the offender to the actual custody of the
correctional center from which the offender was released, or
to any other suitable facility designated by the division.
If any parole or probation officer has probable cause to
believe that such offender has violated a condition of
parole or conditional release, the probation or parole
officer may issue a warrant for the arrest of the offender.
The probation or parole officer may effect the arrest or may
deputize any officer with the power of arrest to do so by
giving the officer a copy of the warrant which shall outline
the circumstances of the alleged violation and contain the
statement that the offender has, in the judgment of the
probation or parole officer, violated conditions of parole
or conditional release. The warrant delivered with the
offender by the arresting officer to the official in charge
of any facility designated by the division to which the
offender is brought shall be sufficient legal authority for
detaining the offender. After the arrest the parole or
probation officer shall present to the detaining authorities

SB 1783 4
a similar statement of the circumstances of violation.
Pending hearing as hereinafter provided, upon any charge of
violation, the offender shall remain in custody or
incarcerated without consideration of bail.
2. If the offender is arrested under the authority
granted in subsection 1 of this section or under the
authority granted in section 217.723, the offender shall
have the right to a preliminary hearing on the violation
charged unless the offender waives such hearing. Upon such
arrest and detention, the parole or probation officer shall
immediately notify the board and shall submit in writing a
report showing in what manner the offender has violated the
conditions of his parole or conditional release. The board
shall order the offender discharged from such facility,
require as a condition of parole or conditional release the
placement of the offender in a treatment center operated by
the department of corrections, or shall cause the offender
to be brought before it for a hearing on the violation
charged, under such rules and regulations as the board may
adopt. If the violation is established and found, the board
may continue or revoke the parole or conditional release, or
enter such other order as it may see fit. If no violation
is established and found, then the parole or conditional
release shall continue. If at any time during release on
parole or conditional release the offender is arrested for a
crime which later leads to conviction, and sentence is then
served outside the Missouri department of corrections, the
board shall determine what part, if any, of the time from
the date of arrest until completion of the sentence imposed
is counted as time served under the sentence from which the
offender was paroled or conditionally released.

SB 1783 5
3. An offender for whose return a warrant has been
issued by the division shall, if it is found that the
warrant cannot be served, be deemed to be a fugitive from
justice or to have fled from justice. If it shall appear
that the offender has violated the provisions and conditions
of his parole or conditional release, the board shall
determine whether the time from the issuing date of the
warrant to the date of his arrest on the warrant, or
continuance on parole or conditional release shall be
counted as time served under the sentence. In all other
cases, time served on parole or conditional release shall be
counted as time served under the sentence.
4. At any time during parole or probation, the
division may issue a warrant for the arrest of any person
from another jurisdiction, the visitation and supervision of
whom the division has undertaken pursuant to the provisions
of the interstate compact for the supervision of parolees
and probationers authorized in section 217.810, for
violation of any of the conditions of release, or a notice
to appear to answer a charge of violation. The notice shall
be served personally upon the person. The warrant shall
authorize any law enforcement officer to return the offender
to any suitable detention facility designated by the
division. Any parole or probation officer may arrest such
person without a warrant, or may deputize any other officer
with power of arrest to do so by issuing a written statement
setting forth that the defendant has, in the judgment of the
parole or probation officer, violated the conditions of his
release. The written statement delivered with the person by
the arresting officer to the official in charge of the
detention facility to which the person is brought shall be
sufficient legal authority for detaining him. After making

SB 1783 6
an arrest the parole or probation officer shall present to
the detaining authorities a similar statement of the
circumstances of violation.
217.722. 1. If any probation officer has probable
cause to believe that the person on probation has violated a
condition of probation, the probation officer may issue a
warrant for the arrest of the person on probation. The
officer may effect the arrest or may deputize any other
officer with the power of arrest to do so by giving the
officer a copy of the warrant which will outline the
circumstances of the alleged violation and contain the
statement that the person on probation has, in the judgment
of the probation officer, violated the conditions of
probation. The warrant delivered with the offender by the
arresting officer to the official in charge of any jail or
other detention facility shall be sufficient authority for
detaining the person on probation pending a preliminary
hearing on the alleged violation. Other provisions of law
relating to release on bail of persons charged with criminal
offenses shall be applicable to persons detained on alleged
probation violations.
2. Any person on probation arrested under the
authority granted in subsection 1 of this section or under
the authority granted in section 217.723 shall have the
right to a preliminary hearing on the violation charged as
long as the person on probation remains in custody or unless
the offender waives such hearing. The person on probation
shall be notified immediately in writing of the alleged
probation violation. If arrested in the jurisdiction of the
sentencing court, and the court which placed the person on
probation is immediately available, the preliminary hearing
shall be heard by the sentencing court. Otherwise, the

SB 1783 7
person on probation shall be taken before a judge or
associate circuit judge in the county of the alleged
violation or arrest having original jurisdiction to try
criminal offenses or before an impartial member of the staff
of the division of probation and parole, and the preliminary
hearing shall be held as soon as possible after the arrest.
Such preliminary hearings shall be conducted as provided by
rule of court or by rules of the parole board. If it
appears that there is probable cause to believe that the
person on probation has violated a condition of probation,
or if the person on probation waives the preliminary
hearing, the judge or associate circuit judge, or member of
the staff of the division of probation and parole shall
order the person on probation held for further proceedings
in the sentencing court. If probable cause is not found,
the court shall not be barred from holding a hearing on the
question of the alleged violation of a condition of
probation nor from ordering the person on probation to be
present at such a hearing.
3. Upon such arrest and detention, the probation
officer shall immediately notify the sentencing court and
shall submit to the court a written report showing in what
manner the person on probation has violated the conditions
of probation. Thereupon, or upon arrest by warrant, the
court shall cause the person on probation to be brought
before it without unnecessary delay for a hearing on the
violation charged. Revocation hearings shall be conducted
as provided by rule of court.
217.723. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the
contrary, any probation or parole officer or law enforcement
officer with power of arrest may arrest a probationer or
parolee without a warrant if the probationer or parolee

SB 1783 8
violates the conditions of probation or parole in the
presence of the arresting officer. The arresting officer,
or his or her agency, as soon as practicable, but no later
than twenty-four hours following the arrest, shall notify
the board of probation and parole of the probationer or
parolee's arrest. The probationer or parolee may be
detained in the county jail or other appropriate place of
detention until the probationer or parolee is brought before
the court as provided under subsection 2 of section 217.720
or under subsection 2 of section 217.722.
✓